Louisiana, session 2026, SB448.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:142(F), 168(E), and 175(B)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 15:142(G) and 175(E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§142. Legislative findings
* * *
F. It is the express intention of the legislature that all funds received
through any state appropriation, any judicial district indigent defender fund as
provided for in R.S. 15:168, and any funds received from local governments
shall not be used for any purposes other than to provide for the administration
of services and representation of public defender clients.
G. It is the express intention of the legislature that the office respect local
differences in practice and custom regarding the delivery of public defender services.
The provisions of this Part are to be construed to preserve the operation of district
public defender programs which provide effective assistance of counsel and meet
performance standards in whatever form of delivery that local district has adopted,
provided that method of delivery is consistent with standards and guidelines adopted
by the office pursuant to rules and as required by statute.
* * *
§168. Judicial district indigent defender fund
* * *
E.(1) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each judicial
district is allowed to accumulate funds for the purposes of retaining expert witnesses.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 448 ENROLLED
The district public defender, in his discretion, shall determine how payments shall
be administered and which experts shall be paid.
(2) Any person who has retained private counsel but is found to be indigent
may apply for funds for expert witnesses in the same manner as public defender
clients. Each person shall apply for the funds by making application to the district
defender of the district having jurisdiction and shall be subject to the same
requirements as indigent clients.
(3) No court shall have jurisdiction to order the payment of any funds
administered by the office or district public defender for expert witnesses, or for any
other reason unless the person makes an application in accordance with R.S.
15:175(A). If the district public defender or state public defender declines the
application for expert witness funding, the matter may be fixed for a
contradictory hearing that is closed to the public and without the presence of
the prosecuting authority. All recordings and transcripts of the contradictory
hearing shall be sealed. To require the payment of any expert witness fee, the
applicant shall demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence at the hearing
and the court shall make specific findings as follows:
(a) The applicant is actually indigent.
(b) Private counsel of the applicant does not have funds that may be used
for expert witnesses.
(c) The source of funding for private counsel is not available for expert
witnesses.
(d) The applicant has demonstrated with a reasonable degree of
specificity what type of expert is needed and the purpose of the expert.
(e) There is a reasonable probability that denial of the expert's assistance
would result in a fundamentally unfair trial for the applicant.
(2) The findings and ruling of the court are subject to immediate
interlocutory review by the appellate court of competent jurisdiction.
* * *
§175. Proceedings to determine indigency
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 448 ENROLLED
* * *
B.(1) In determining making a preliminary determination as to whether
or not a person is indigent and entitled to the appointment of counsel, the court shall
consider whether the person is a needy person and the extent of his ability to pay.
The court may consider such factors as income or funds from employment or any
other source, including public assistance, to which the accused is entitled, property
owned by the accused or in which he has an economic interest, outstanding
obligations, the number and ages of dependents, employment and job training
history, and level of education.
* * *
E. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no clerk of
court shall charge or collect any fees, including convenience fees, for the filing
of a writ application or an appeal when a determination has been made that the
applicant or appellant is indigent.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.